District of Columbia statutes.
16-4704

Activities not constituting a waiver.

The publication by the news media or the dissemination by a person employed by the news media of a source of news or information, or a portion of the news or information, procured while pursuing professional activities shall not constitute a waiver of the protection from compelled disclosure that is contained in section 16-4702 .

History

Sept. 26, 1992, D.C. Law 9-156, § 2, 39 DCR 5682

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-4704.